Florida, session 2026, SB1194.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 20 21 Section 1.âSubsection (20) is added to section 1001.03, 22 Florida Statutes, to read: 23 1001.03âSpecific powers of State Board of Education.â 24 (20)âARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE POLICIES.âThe State Board of 25 Education shall adopt statewide standards and a policy for 26 school use and student use of artificial intelligence (AI). 27 (a)âThe policies must: 28 1.âAllow student use of AI only when a teacher has 29 expressly permitted its use in certain applications. 30 2.âRequire a student to disclose how AI was used in his or 31 her work. 32 3.âRequire AI-monitoring safeguards and proctored 33 assessments for the Florida Virtual School. 34 (b)âThe board shall direct the Department of Education to: 35 1.âCollect metrics on: 36 a.âStudent use of AI in academics. 37 b.âTeacher-reported instances of academic dishonesty. 38 c.âPerformance data for statewide assessments in reading, 39 writing, and mathematics. 40 d.âGraduation readiness metrics from the Florida Virtual 41 School. 42 2.âProvide training for teachers on the use of AI, AI 43 detection tools, and strategies for responsible use of AI. 44 3.âReview school district compliance with AI policies and 45 standards. 46 Section 2.âParagraph (o) of subsection (2) of section 47 1003.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 48 1003.42âRequired instruction.â 49 (2)âMembers of the instructional staff of the public 50 schools, subject to the rules of the State Board of Education 51 and the district school board, shall teach efficiently and 52 faithfully, using the books and materials required that meet the 53 highest standards for professionalism and historical accuracy, 54 following the prescribed courses of study, and employing 55 approved methods of instruction, the following: 56 (o)âComprehensive age-appropriate and developmentally 57 appropriate K-12 instruction on: 58 1.âHealth education that addresses concepts of community 59 health, consumer health, environmental health, and family life, 60 including: 61 a.âInjury prevention and safety. 62 b.âInternet safety. 63 c.âNutrition. 64 d.âPersonal health. 65 e.âPrevention and control of disease. 66 f.âSubstance use and abuse. 67 g.âPrevention of child sexual abuse, exploitation, and 68 human trafficking. 69 2.âFor students in grades 7 through 12, teen dating 70 violence and abuse. This component must include, but not be 71 limited to, the definition of dating violence and abuse, the 72 warning signs of dating violence and abusive behavior, the 73 characteristics of healthy relationships, measures to prevent 74 and stop dating violence and abuse, and community resources 75 available to victims of dating violence and abuse. 76 3.âFor students in grades 6 through 12, awareness of the 77 benefits of sexual abstinence as the expected standard and the 78 consequences of teenage pregnancy. 79 4.âLife skills that build confidence, support mental and 80 emotional health, and enable students to overcome challenges, 81 including: 82 a.âSelf-awareness and self-management. 83 b.âResponsible decisionmaking. 84 c.âResiliency. 85 d.âRelationship skills and conflict resolution. 86 e.âUnderstanding and respecting other viewpoints and 87 backgrounds. 88 f.âFor grades 9 through 12, developing leadership skills, 89 interpersonal skills, organization skills, and research skills; 90 creating a rÃ©sumÃ©, including a digital rÃ©sumÃ©; exploring career 91 pathways; using state career planning resources; developing and 92 practicing the skills necessary for employment interviews; 93 workplace ethics and workplace law; managing stress and 94 expectations; and self-motivation. 95 5.a.âFor students in grades 6 through 12:, 96 (I)âThe social, emotional, and physical effects of social 97 media. This component must include, but need not be limited to, 98 the negative effects of social media on mental health, including 99 addiction; the distribution of misinformation on social media; 100 how social media manipulates behavior; the permanency of sharing 101 materials online; how to maintain personal security and identify 102 cyberbullying, predatory behavior, and human trafficking on the 103 Internet; and how to report suspicious behavior encountered on 104 the Internet. 105 (II)âDigital literacy and the ethics of using artificial 106 intelligence for English Language Arts and technology courses. 107 b.âThe Department of Education shall make available online 108 the instructional material being used pursuant to this 109 subparagraph, and each district school board shall notify 110 parents of its availability. 111 112 Health education and life skills instruction and materials may 113 not contradict the principles enumerated in subsection (3). 114 115 The State Board of Education is encouraged to adopt standards 116 and pursue assessment of the requirements of this subsection. 117 Instructional programming that incorporates the values of the 118 recipients of the Congressional Medal of Honor and that is 119 offered as part of a social studies, English Language Arts, or 120 other schoolwide character building and veteran awareness 121 initiative meets the requirements of paragraph (u). 122 Section 3.âParagraph (p) is added to subsection (2) of 123 section 1006.07, Florida Statutes, to read: 124 1006.07âDistrict school board duties relating to student 125 discipline and school safety.âThe district school board shall 126 provide for the proper accounting for all students, for the 127 attendance and control of students at school, and for proper 128 attention to health, safety, and other matters relating to the 129 welfare of students, including: 130 (2)âCODE OF STUDENT CONDUCT.âAdopt a code of student 131 conduct for elementary schools and a code of student conduct for 132 middle and high schools and distribute the appropriate code to 133 all teachers, school personnel, students, and parents, at the 134 beginning of every school year. Each code shall be organized and 135 written in language that is understandable to students and 136 parents and shall be discussed at the beginning of every school 137 year in student classes, school advisory council meetings, and 138 parent and teacher association or organization meetings. Each 139 code shall be based on the rules governing student conduct and 140 discipline adopted by the district school board and shall be 141 made available in the student handbook or similar publication. 142 Each code shall include, but is not limited to: 143 (p)âPolicies on the use of artificial intelligence pursuant 144 to s. 1001.03(20). 145 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.